src/fst/affixes/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON PRON_MEZE_Cases !мезе:мӒ4
+Pl+Nom+Indef:зь%>т%{ЬØ%} ENDLEX ; 
+Pl+Nom+Indef+Use/NG+Err/Orth:сь%>т%{ЬØ%} ENDLEX ; 
+SP+Abe+Indef:зе%>вт{оеэ%}мО1 ENDLEX ;
+SP+Abl:зде OBL-PX4-END-FOC-OR_ENDLEX ;
+SP+Abl:зе%>%{дт%}О1 OBL-PX4-END-FOC-OR_ENDLEX ;
+SP+Dat+Indef:знень ENDLEX ;
+SP+Dat+Indef:зенень ENDLEX ;
+SP+Ela:й%>ст%{оэØ%} OBL-PX4-END-FOC-OR_ENDLEX ;
+SP+Ela:зе%>ст%{оэØ%} OBL-PX4-END-FOC-OR_ENDLEX ;
+SP+Gen+Indef:зе%>нь ENDLEX ;
+SP+Gen+Indef:%>нь ENDLEX ;
+SP+Ine:й%>с%{оэØ%} OBL-PX4-END-FOC-OR_ENDLEX ;
+SP+Ine:зе%>с%{оэØ%} OBL-PX4-END-FOC-OR_ENDLEX ;
+SP+Ill+Indef:й%>с ENDLEX ;
+SP+Ill+Indef:зе%>с ENDLEX ;
+Sg+Nom+Indef:зе ENDLEX ;

+SP+Ela+Der/GenAttr:й%>ст%{оэØ%}%>нь ENDLEX ;
+SP+Ela+Der/GenAttr:зе%>ст%{оэØ%}%>нь ENDLEX ;
+SP+Abl+Der/GenAttr:з%>%{дт%}О1%>нь ENDLEX ;
+SP+Abl+Der/GenAttr:зе%>%{дт%}О1%>нь ENDLEX ;
+SP+Ine+Der/GenAttr:й%>с%{оэØ%}%>нь ENDLEX ;
+SP+Ine+Der/GenAttr:зе%>с%{оэØ%}%>нь ENDLEX ;
!2009-09-29!+Ine:%>с%{оэØ%} _KUDO-Tenses1 ;

+Pl+Abe+Def:з%>тне%>втеме ENDLEX ;
+Pl+Abl+Def:з%>тнеде ENDLEX ;
+Pl+Cmpr+Def:з%>тне%>шка ENDLEX ;
+Pl+Dat+Def:з%>тне%>нень ENDLEX ;
+Pl+Gen+Def:з%>тне%>нь ENDLEX ;
+Pl+Ela+Def:з%>тне%>стэ ENDLEX ;
+Pl+Ill+Def:з%>тне%>с ENDLEX ;
+Pl+Ine+Def:з%>тне%>сэ ENDLEX ;
+Pl+Lat+Def:з%>тне%>в ENDLEX ;
+Pl+Nom+Def:з%>тне ENDLEX ;
+Pl+Tra+Def:з%>тне%>кс ENDLEX ;

+Sg+Abl+Def:з%>денть ENDLEX ;
+Sg+Dat+Def:зе%>нтень ENDLEX ;
+Sg+Gen+Def:зе%>нть ENDLEX ;
+Sg+Ine+Def:йсэ%>нть ENDLEX ;
+Sg+Nom+Def:зе%>сь ENDLEX ;
+Sg+Nom+Def:й%>сь ENDLEX ;

+Sg+Nom+PxSg1:зем ENDLEX ;
+Sg+Nom+PxSg2:зеть ENDLEX ;
+Sg+Nom+PxSg3:зезэ ENDLEX ;
+Sg+Nom+PxPl1:зенек ENDLEX ;
+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Dial/NW:земек ENDLEX ;
+Sg+Nom+PxPl2:зенк ENDLEX ;
+Sg+Nom+PxPl3:зест ENDLEX ;


!LEXICON _OSH-Indef_Pronouns-Cases
!!+Pl+Nom:%>т%{ЬØ%} INDEF-ENDS-HERE ; 
!+Abe:%>вт{оеэ%}мО1 INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
!+Abl:%>%{дт%}О1 INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
!+Dat:%>нень INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
!+Ela:%>%{оеэØ%}ст%{оэØ%} INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
!+Ine:%>%{оеэØ%}с%{оэØ%} INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
!+Ill:%>%{оеэØ%}с INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
!+Tra:%>%{оеэØ%}кс INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;

!+Gen:%>%{оеэØ%}нь INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
!+Com:%>нек INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
!+Abl+Der/GenAttr:%>%{дт%}О1%>нь INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
!+Ela+Der/GenAttr:%>%{оеэØ%}ст%{оэØ%}%>нь INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
!+Ine+Der/GenAttr:%>%{оеэØ%}с%{оэØ%}%>нь INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;

!+Sg+Nom+Def:%>%{оеэØ%}сь INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
!+Sg+Gen+Def:%>%{оеэØ%}нть INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
!+Sg+Dat+Def:%>%{оеэØ%}нтень INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;

!+Pl+Nom+Def:%>тне INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
!+Pl+Gen+Def:%>тне%>нь INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
!+Pl+Dat+Def:%>тне%>нень INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
!+Pl+Abl+Def:%>тне%>де INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
!+Pl+Ela+Def:%>тне%>стэ INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
!+Pl+Ine+Def:%>тне%>сэ INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
!+Pl+Ill+Def:%>тне%>с INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
!+Pl+Lat+Def:%>тне%>в INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
!+Pl+Tra+Def:%>тне%>кс INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
!+Pl+Abe+Def:%>тне%>втеме INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
!+Pl+Cmpr+Def:%>тне%>шка INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;

LEXICON _KUDO-Indef_Pronouns-Cases
+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>т%{ЬØ%} INDEF-ENDS-HERE ; 

+Ela:%>ст%{оэØ%} INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Ine:%>с%{оэØ%} INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Ill:%>с INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Dat:%>нень INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Abe:%>вт{оеэ%}мО1 INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Abl:%>%{дт%}О1 INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Ela+Der/GenAttr:%>ст%{оэØ%}%>нь INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Abl+Der/GenAttr:%>%{дт%}О1%>нь INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Ine+Der/GenAttr:%>с%{оэØ%}%>нь INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Gen:%>нь INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
!2009-09-29!+Ine:%>с%{оэØ%} _KUDO-Tenses1 ;
+Ill:%>з%{оэØ%} INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Ill:%>з%{оэØ%}нь INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;

+Sg+Nom+Def:%>сь INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Sg+Gen+Def:%>нть INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Sg+Dat+Def:%>нтень INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;

+Pl+Nom+Def:%>тне INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Pl+Gen+Def:%>тне%>нь INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Pl+Abl+Def:%>тне%>%{дт%}О1 INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Pl+Dat+Def:%>тне%>нень INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Pl+Ine+Def:%>тне%>с%{оэØ%} INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Pl+Ela+Def:%>тне%>ст%{оэØ%} INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Pl+Ill+Def:%>тне%>с INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;

+Pl+Nom+PxPl1:%>н{оеэ%}к INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Pl+Nom+PxPl2:%>нк INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
+Pl+Nom+PxPl3:%>ст INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;


LEXICON Indef_Pronouns-K
@R.INDEF.PREF@ Indef_Pronouns-K-pref ;
@D.INDEF.PREF@ Indef_Pronouns-K-post ;

LEXICON Indef_Pronouns-K-pref
! Removing +Clt tag, this is a derivation
: ENDLEX ;

LEXICON Indef_Pronouns-K-post
! Removing +Clt tag, these derivations
+Der+Der/buti:%-бути ENDLEX ;
+Der+Der/Gak:%>Г1ак ENDLEX ;
!+Rel:  ENDLEX ; 2017-03-11
!:  ENDLEX ; 2017-03-11


LEXICON INDEF-ENDS-HERE
@U.INDEF.GAK@:@U.INDEF.GAK@%>Г1ак ENDLEX ;
@U.INDEF.BUTI@:@U.INDEF.BUTI@%-бути ENDLEX ;
@U.INDEF.TAGO@ ENDLEX ; 
@U.INDEF.TA@ ENDLEX ;
@U.INDEF.KOI@ ENDLEX ;

LEXICON Dem-tona
!+Dem+Adn: ENDLEX ;
+Dem: Pron-Sg ;
+Dem: Pron-Pl ;

LEXICON Pron-Sg
+Sg+Nom+Indef: K ;
+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>нь K ;
+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>нень K ;
+Sg+Abl+Indef:%>%{дт%}О1 K ;
+Sg+Ill+Indef:%>с K ;

+Sg+Nom+Def:%>сь K ;
+Sg+Gen+Def:%>нть K ;
+Sg+Dat+Def:%>нтень K ;
+Sg+Abl+Def:%>%{дт%}О1%>нть K ;

LEXICON Pron-Pl
+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>т%{ЬØ%} K ;
+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>нь K ;
+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>нень K ;
+Pl+Abl+Indef:%>%{дт%}О1 K ;
+Pl+Ill+Indef:%>с K ;

+Pl+Nom+Def:%>тне K ;
+Pl+Gen+Def:%>тне%>нь K ;
+Pl+Dat+Def:%>тне%>нень K ;
+Pl+Abl+Def:%>тне%>де K ;
+Pl+Ill+Def:%>тне%>с K ;
+Pl+Ine+Def:%>тне%>сэ K ;

!LEXICON Misc_Pronouns
!!се+Dem:се vese-QNT ;
!!секе+Dem+Pron:секе vese-QNT ; ! This also allows plural
!!сете+Dem+Pron:сете DET-DEM_TE ;
!!те+Dem:те DET-DEM_TE ;
!!тевате+Dem:тевате DET-DEM_TE ;

!севате+Dem+Pron:севате DET-DEM_TE ;
!тете+Dem:тете DET-DEM_TE ;
!
!те+Dem+Pron+Gen+Abl:тенде K ;
!те+Dem+Pron+Gen+Abe+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial:тенстеме K ;
!
!!истямо+Adn:истям Misc_Pronouns1 ;
!кона+Pron:кона Misc_Pronouns1 ;
!коната+Pron:коната Misc_Pronouns1 ;
!нона+Dem+Pron:нона Misc_Pronouns_Pl ;
!тона+Dem+Pron:тона Misc_Pronouns1 ;
!тоната+Dem+Pron:тоната Misc_Pronouns1 ;
!! мезе+Pron:мезИ2 Misc_Pronouns1 ;
!! мезе+Pron+Rel+Gen:мень K ;
!! ки+Pron:ки Misc_Pronouns1 ;
!!не+Dem:не ne-Misc_Pronouns1 ;
!!неке+Dem+Pron:неке ne-Misc_Pronouns1 ;
!!нете+Dem+Pron:нете Misc_Pronouns1 ;

!LEXICON PRON-SPAT-ELA_4-PX !!= * __@CODE@__ эйстэ-
!+Ela: POSSX4-END ;

!LEXICON PRON-SPAT-ILL_4-PX !!= * __@CODE@__ эйзэ-
!+Ill: POSSX4-END ;

!LEXICON PRON-SPAT-INE_4-PX !!= * __@CODE@__ эйсэ-
!+Ine: POSSX4-END ;

!LEXICON PRON-SPAT-PRL_4-PX !!= * __@CODE@__ эзга-
!+Prl: POSSX4-END ;


! ============================= !
!  Person morphological lexica !
! ============================= !



!! Some pronoun continuation have been moved here
!! Out of TestLexc-noun.txt

!LEXICON Misc_Pronouns1
! Misc_Pronouns_Sg ;
! Misc_Pronouns_Pl ;
!+Adn: ENDLEX ;
! PossPX1-NomSg ; !2012-08-09 Removing NomGen
!+Gen: PossPX1 ; !2012-08-09 Removing NomGen

!LEXICON IS-PRON-DEM-SG-ABL-INDEF
!+Sg+Abl+Indef: K ;
!LEXICON IS-PRON-DEM-SG-ELA-INDEF
!+Sg+Ela+Indef: K ;
!LEXICON IS-PRON-DEM-SG-INE-INDEF
!+Sg+Ine+Indef: K ;

!LEXICON IS-PRON-DEM-PL-DAT-INDEF
!+Pl+Dat+Indef: K ;

!LEXICON IS-PRON-DEM-PL-NOM-INDEF
!+Pl+Nom+Indef: K ;

!LEXICON IS-PRON-DEM-PL-NOM-DEF
!+Pl+Nom+Def: K ;


LEXICON PRON-DEM_TE
+Sg+Abe+Indef:%>нтеме K ;
+Sg+Abl+Indef:%>де K ;
+Sg+Abl+Indef:%>нде K ;
+Sg+Abl+Def:%>денть K ;
+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>нень K ;
+Sg+Ela+Indef:%>ньстэ K ;
+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>нь K ;
+Sg+Ill+Indef:%>ньс K ;
+Sg+Ine+Indef:%>ньсэ K ;
+Sg+Nom+Indef: K ;

!LEXICON PRON-DEM_TEKE
!+Dem: _KUDO-Misc_Pronouns_Sg ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM_TONA
+Sg+Abe+Indef:%>нтомо K ;
+Sg+Abl+Indef:%>до K ;
+Sg+Abl+Indef:%>нде K ;
+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>нень K ;
+Sg+Ela+Indef:%>ньстэ K ;
+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>нь K ;
+Sg+Ill+Indef:%>ньс K ;
+Sg+Ine+Indef:%>ньсэ K ;
+Sg+Ela+Indef:%>сто K ;
+Sg+Ill+Indef:%>с K ;
+Sg+Ine+Indef:%>со K ;
+Sg+Nom+Indef: K ;
+Sg+Prl+Indef:%>ва K ;
!
+Sg+Abl+Def:%>донть K ;
+Pl+Abl+Def:%>тнеде K ;
+Sg+Dat+Def:%>нтень K ;
+Sg+Ela+Def:%>стонть K ;
+Pl+Gen+Def:%>тнень K ;
+Pl+Ine+Def:%>тнесэ K ;


LEXICON PRON-DEM_VASENCE
!+Ord: _KUDO-Misc_Pronouns_Sg ;
+Ord: NMN_KUDO ;

!LEXICON DET_VASENCE
!+Det+Ord: _KUDO-Misc_Pronouns_Sg ;

!LEXICON PRON-DEM_KUDO !!= * __@CODE@__ алце
!+Dem: NMN_KUDO ;

LEXICON INDEF_PRONOUNS-IN-BUTI 
косо-бути+Adv+Indef+Ine+Clt/Cop+Prs+ScSg1:косан INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
косо-бути+Adv+Indef+Ine+Clt/Cop+Prs+ScSg3:косо INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
косо-бути+Adv+Indef+Ine+Clt/Cop+Prs+ScPl2:косотадо INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
косо-бути+Adv+Indef+Ine+Clt/Cop+Prt2+ScSg1:косолинь INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
косо-бути+Adv+Indef+Ine+Clt/Cop+Prt2+ScSg3:косоль INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
косо-бути+Adv+Indef+Ine+Clt/Cop+Prt2+ScPl2:косолиде INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
козонь-бути+Adv+Indef+Ill:козонь INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
косто-бути+Adv+Indef+Ela:косто INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
кува-бути+Adv+Indef+Prl:кува INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
зярдо-бути+v1+Adv+Indef+Sem/Time:зярдо INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
зяро-бути+v1+Adv+Indef+Qnt:зяро INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
зяроксть-бути+v1+Adv+Indef+Iter:зяроксть INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
зярс-бути+v1+Adv+Indef+Sem/Time+Ill:зярс INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
зяросто-бути+v1+Adv+Indef+Ela:зяросто INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
зярдонь-бути+v1+A+Indef+Sem/Time:зярдонь INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
кодамо-бути+A+Indef+SP+Dat+Indef:кодамонень INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
кодамо-бути+A+Indef+Sg+Nom+Indef:кодамо INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
кодамо-бути+A+Indef+Sg+Nom+Indef+Clt/Cop+Prs+ScSg1:кодаман INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
кодамо-бути+A+Indef+Sg+Nom+Indef+Clt/Cop+Prs+ScSg3:кодамо INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
кодамо-бути+A+Indef+Pl+Nom+Indef+Clt/Cop+Prs+ScPl2:кодатадо INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
кодамо-бути+A+Indef+Sg+Nom+Indef+Clt/Cop+Prs+ScSg1:кодамолинь INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
кодамо-бути+A+Indef+Sg+Nom+Indef+Clt/Cop+Prs+ScSg3:кодамоль INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
кодамо-бути+A+Indef+Sg+Nom+Indef+Clt/Cop+Prs+ScPl2:кодамолиде INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
кона-бути+Det+Indef+Sg+Nom+Indef:кона INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
кона-бути+Det+Indef+Pl+Nom+Def:конатне INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
кона-бути+Det+Indef+Sg+Nom+PxPl2:конанк INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
мекс-бути+Adv+Indef+Tra:мекс INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
LEXICON INDEF_PRONOUNS-IN-GAK 
ковгак+Adv+Indef+Lat:ков INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
коволдояк+Adv+Indef+Abl:коволдо INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
коволгаяк+Adv+Indef+Prl:коволга INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
косояк+Adv+Indef+Ine+Clt/Cop+Prs+ScSg1:косан INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
косояк+Adv+Indef+Ine+Clt/Cop+Prs+ScSg3:косо INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
косояк+Adv+Indef+Ine+Clt/Cop+Prs+ScPl2:косотадо INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
косояк+Adv+Indef+Ine+Clt/Cop+Prt2+ScSg1:косолинь INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
косояк+Adv+Indef+Ine+Clt/Cop+Prt2+ScSg3:косоль INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
косояк+Adv+Indef+Ine+Clt/Cop+Prt2+ScPl2:косолиде INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
козоньгак+Adv+Indef+Ill:козонь INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
костояк+Adv+Indef+Ela:косто INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
куваяк+Adv+Indef+Prl:кува INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
зярдояк+Adv+Indef+Sem/Time:зярдо INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
зярояк+Adv+Indef:зяро INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
зярокстькак+Adv+Indef+Iter:зяроксть INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
зярскак+Adv+Indef+Sem/Time+Ill:зярс INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
зяростояк+Adv+Indef+Ela:зяросто INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
зярдоньгак+A+Indef+Sem/Time:зярдонь INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
кодамояк+A+Indef+SP+Dat+Indef:кодамонень INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
кодамояк+A+Indef+Sg+Nom+Indef:кодамо INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
кодамояк+A+Indef+Sg+Nom+Indef+Clt/Cop+Prs+ScSg1:кодаман INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
кодамояк+A+Indef+Sg+Nom+Indef+Clt/Cop+Prs+ScSg3:кодамо INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
кодамояк+A+Indef+Pl+Nom+Indef+Clt/Cop+Prs+ScPl2:кодатадо INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
кодамояк+A+Indef+Sg+Nom+Indef+Clt/Cop+Prs+ScSg1:кодамолинь INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
кодамояк+A+Indef+Sg+Nom+Indef+Clt/Cop+Prs+ScSg3:кодамоль INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
кодамояк+A+Indef+Sg+Nom+Indef+Clt/Cop+Prs+ScPl2:кодамолиде INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
кодамояк+A+Indef+Pl+Nom+Indef+Clt/Cop+Prs+ScPl1:кодатолинек INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
кодамояк+A+Indef+Pl+Nom+Indef+Clt/Cop+Prs+ScPl3:кодатольть INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
конаяк+Det+Indef+Sg+Nom+Indef:кона INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
конаяк+Det+Indef+SP+Gen+Indef:конань INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
конаяк+Det+Indef+Sg+Dat+Def:конантень INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
конаяк+Det+Indef+Sg+Nom+Def:конась INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
конаяк+Det+Indef+Pl+Ine+Def:конатнесэ INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
конаяк+Det+Indef+Sg+Nom+PxPl2:конанк INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
мезеяк+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom+Indef+Use/SpellNoSugg:месть INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
мезеяк+Pron+Indef+SP+Abl+Indef:мезде INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
мезеяк+Pron+Indef+SP+Ill+Indef:мейс INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
мезеяк+Pron+Indef+Sg+Abl+Def:мезденть INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
мезеяк+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom+Def:мейсь INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
мезеяк+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom+Def:мезтне INDEF-ENDS-HERE ;
кияк+Pron+Indef+SP+Abl:киде INDEF-ENDS-HERE ; 
